Colorado statutes. TITLE 1 Elections
PART 13
SURVEY OF RETURNS

1-13.5-1301. Survey of returns - canvass board.

At least fifteen days before any election, the designated election official shall appoint at least one member of the governing body of a local government, and at least one eligible elector of the local government who is not a member of that body, to assist the designated election official in the survey of returns. The persons so appointed and the designated election official constitute the canvass board for the election.

To the fullest extent possible, no member of the canvass board nor the member's spouse or civil union partner shall have a direct interest in the election.

If, for any reason, any person appointed as a member of the canvass board refuses, fails, or is unable to serve, that appointed person shall notify the designated election official, who shall appoint another person that possesses the same qualifications as the original appointee as directed under subsection (1) of this section, if available, to the canvass board.

Each canvass board member who is not a member of the governing body shall receive a minimum fee of fifteen dollars for each day of service. The fee shall be set by the designated election official and paid by the local government for which the service is performed.

Source:

L. 2014:

Entire article added, (HB 14-1164), ch. 2, p. 51, § 6, effective February 18.

1-13.5-1302. Imperfect returns.

If the canvass board finds that the returns from any polling place do not strictly conform to the requirements of law in the making, certifying, and returning of the returns, the votes cast in that polling place nevertheless must be canvassed and counted if such returns are sufficiently explicit to enable the persons authorized to canvass votes and returns to determine how many votes were cast for each candidate, ballot issue, or ballot question.

Source:

L. 2014:

Entire article added, (HB 14-1164), ch. 2, p. 51, § 6, effective February 18.

1-13.5-1303. Corrections.

If, upon proceeding to canvass the votes, it clearly appears to the canvass board that in any statement produced to them certain matters are omitted that should have been inserted or that any mistakes which are merely clerical exist, the canvass board shall send the statement to the election judges from whom they were received to have the mistakes corrected. The election judges, when so demanded, shall make such corrections as the facts of the case require, but shall not change or alter any decision made before by them. The canvass board may adjourn from day to day for the purpose of obtaining and receiving the statement.

Source:

L. 2014:

Entire article added, (HB 14-1164), ch. 2, p. 51, § 6, effective February 18.

1-13.5-1304. Tie - lots - notice to candidates.

If any two or more candidates receive an equal and highest number of votes for the same office, and if there are not enough offices remaining for all such candidates, the canvass board shall determine by lot the person who shall be elected. Reasonable notice shall be given to such candidates of the time when such election will be so determined.

Source:

L. 2014:

Entire article added, (HB 14-1164), ch. 2, p. 52, § 6, effective February 18.

1-13.5-1305. Statement - certificates of election.

No later than the fourteenth day following the election, the canvass board shall make statements from the official abstract of votes that show the names of the candidates, any ballot issue or ballot question, and the number of votes given to each. The canvass board shall certify the statement to be correct and subscribe their names thereto. The canvass board shall then determine which persons have been duly elected by the highest number of votes and shall endorse and subscribe on such statements a certificate of their determination. The designated election official shall also file a copy of the certificate with the division of local government in the department of local affairs.

The designated election official shall make and transmit to each of the persons thereby declared to be elected a certificate of the person's election.

Source:

L. 2014:

Entire article added, (HB 14-1164), ch. 2, p. 52, § 6, effective February 18.

L. 2016:

Entire section amended, (HB 16-1442), ch. 313, p. 1269, § 15, effective August 10.

1-13.5-1306. Recount.

The designated election official shall order a recount of the votes cast in any election if it appears, as evidenced by the survey of returns, that the difference between the highest number of votes cast in the election and the next highest number of votes cast in the election is less than or equal to one-half of one percent of the highest number of votes cast in the election. Any recount conducted pursuant to this subsection (1) shall be completed no later than the twenty-eighth day following the election and shall be paid for by the governing body of the local government. The designated election official shall give notice of the recount to the governing body, to all candidates and, in the case of a ballot issue or question, to any issue committee that are affected by the result of the election. The notice must be given by any means reasonably expected to notify the affected candidates or issue committee. An affected candidate or issue committee is allowed to be present during and observe the recount.

Whenever a recount of the votes cast in an election is not required pursuant to subsection (1) of this section, any interested party, including an eligible elector or a candidate for office or the issue committee for a ballot issue or question, may submit to the designated election official a written request for a recount at the expense of the interested party making the request. This request shall be filed with the designated election official within seventeen days after the election.

Before conducting the recount, the designated election official shall:

Give notice of the recount in accordance with subsection (1) of this section;

Determine the cost of the recount;

Notify the interested party that requested the recount of such cost; and

Collect the actual cost of conducting the recount from such interested party.

The interested party that requested the recount shall pay on demand the cost of the recount to the designated election official. The funds paid to the designated election official for the recount must be held and used for payment of all expenses incurred in the recount.

If, after the recount, the result of the election is reversed in favor of the interested party that requested the recount or if the amended election count is such that a recount otherwise would have been required pursuant to subsection (1) of this section, the payment for expenses must be refunded to the interested party who paid them.

Any recount of votes conducted pursuant to this subsection (2) must be completed no later than the twenty-eighth day after canvassing the election.

If any leftover funds remain from the deposit paid under paragraph (c) of this subsection (2), and the recount does not change the result of the election, the designated election official shall return that unused portion of the deposit to the interested party who paid it.

The designated election official is responsible for conducting the recount and shall be assisted by those persons who assisted in preparing the official abstract of votes. If those persons cannot participate in the recount, other persons shall be appointed as provided in section 1-13.5-1301. The designated election official may appoint additional persons qualified to be the election judges who did not serve as judges in the election as assistants in conducting the recount. Persons assisting in the conduct of the recount shall be compensated as provided in section 1-13.5-1301 (4).

The designated election official may require the production of any documentary evidence regarding the legality of any vote cast or counted and may correct the survey of returns in accordance with the designated election official's findings based on the evidence presented.

In elections using paper or electronic ballots, the recounts are of the ballots cast and the votes must be tallied on sheets other than those used at the election. In elections using voting machines, the recount is of the votes tabulated on the voting machines, and separate tally sheets must be used for each machine.

After a recount conducted pursuant to this section has been completed, the designated election official shall notify the governing body of the local government conducting the election of the results of the recount, shall make a certificate of election for each candidate who received the highest number of votes for an office for which a recount was conducted, and shall deliver the certificate to such candidate.

Source:

L. 2014:

Entire article added, (HB 14-1164), ch. 2, p. 52, § 6, effective February 18.